Utah statutes.
48-2c-504.   Operating agreement for a one-member company.
(1)  A written declaration or written guidelines signed by the sole member of
a company constitutes an operating agreement for purposes of this chapter if
the member designates in the declaration or guidelines that the written
declaration or guidelines constitutes the operating agreement.
(2)  The operating agreement of a company having only one member shall not be
unenforceable by reason of there being only one person who is a party to the
agreement.
